src/fst/affixes/VTA_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_aw_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+2Pl:gosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+2Sg:gosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+Incl:gosiiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+2Pl:gosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+2Sg:gosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+Incl:gosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl:sinooninimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg:sinooninaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg:isiimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl:isiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg:isiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl:isiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl:gosiiwaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg:gosiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl:gosiinaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl:gosiiwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg:gosiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl:gosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl:goosiimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg:goosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl:goosiimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg:goosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl:goosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+2Pl:gosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+2Sg:gosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+Incl:gosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+2Pl:gosiinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+2Sg:gosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+Incl:gosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl:sinooninim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg:isiim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawaag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl:isiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg:isiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl:isiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl:gosiiwaag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg:gosiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl:gosiinaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl:gosiiwaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg:gosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl:gosiinaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl:goosiim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg:goosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl:goosiim # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg:goosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl:goosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+2Pl:gosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+2Sg:gosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+Incl:gosiiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+2Pl:gosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+2Sg:gosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+Incl:gosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl:sinooninimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg:sinooninaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg:isiimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl:isiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg:isiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl:isiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl:gosiiwaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg:gosiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl:gosiinaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl:gosiiwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg:gosiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl:gosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl:goosiimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg:goosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl:goosiimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg:goosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl:goosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2Pl:gonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2Sg:gonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+Incl:gominaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+2Pl:gonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+2Sg:gonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+Incl:gominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl:ninimwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg:ninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg:imwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aawaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl:iminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg:inaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl:iminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl:gowaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg:godogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl:gonaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl:gowaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg:godog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl:gonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl:goomwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg:goonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl:goomwaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg:goonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl:goominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+2Pl:gonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+2Sg:gonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+Incl:gomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+2Pl:gonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+2Sg:gon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+Incl:gomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl:ninim # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg:im # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx:aawaag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx:aawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl:imin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx:aag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx:aa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl:imin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl:gowaag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg:goog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl:gonaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl:gowaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg:g # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl:gonaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl:goom # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg:goo # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx:aanaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx:aanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl:goom # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg:goo # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl:goomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2Pl:gonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2Sg:gonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+Incl:gominaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+2Pl:gonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+2Sg:gonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+Incl:gominaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl:ninimwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg:ninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg:imwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx:aawaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx:aawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl:iminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg:inaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx:aabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx:aaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl:iminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl:gowaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg:gobaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl:gonaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl:gowaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg:goban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl:gonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl:goomwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg:goonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx:aanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx:aanaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl:goomwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg:goonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl:goominaaban # ;

LEXICON VTA_aw_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTA_aw_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VTA_aw_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+1Sg:gosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+Excl:gosiiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+1Sg:gosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+Excl:gosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg:gosiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl:gosiinaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg:gosiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl:gosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg:goosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl:goosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+1Sg:gosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+Excl:gosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+1Sg:gosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+Excl:gosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg:gosiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl:gosiinaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg:gosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl:gosiinaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg:goosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl:goosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+1Sg:gosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+Excl:gosiiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+1Sg:gosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+Excl:gosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg:gosiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl:gonaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg:gosiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl:gosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg:goosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl:goosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+1Sg:gonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+Excl:gominaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+1Sg:gonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+Excl:gominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg:godogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl:gonaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg:godog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl:gonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg:goonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl:goominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+1Sg:gonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+Excl:gomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+1Sg:gon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+Excl:gomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx:aag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx:aa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg:goog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl:gonaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg:g # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl:gonaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx:aanaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx:aanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg:goo # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl:goomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+1Sg:gonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+Excl:gominaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+1Sg:gonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+Excl:gominaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx:aabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx:aaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg:gobaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl:gosiinaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg:goban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl:gonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx:aanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx:aanaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg:goonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl:goominaaban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTA, Stem Type = Cw   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Cw_Subclass
+VTA:0 VTA_Cw_Flags ;

LEXICON VTA_Cw_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTA_Cw_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTA_Cw_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTA_Cw_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTA_Cw_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTA_Cw_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTA_Cw_ni_Endings ;
